Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3901.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin SCHOOL SAFETY THREAT ASSESSMENT PILOT PROJECT.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Establishment. new text end new text begin (a) The Department of Public Safety's Office of Justice Programs, in consultation with the School Safety Center, must establish a pilot project to assess for, prevent, and respond to visible and concealed threats affecting student and staff safety in schools. new text end new text begin (b) The Office of Justice Programs must contract with a vendor for services that integrate advanced threat anticipation, real-time monitoring, and rapid response capabilities to enhance protection of students, educators, administrators, and staff. The services must provide real-time alerts to coordinate with emergency services. The services must be capable of integrating with and complementing existing school security applications and coordinating locking school doors to keep threats outside of school buildings. The services may use predictive analytics and artificial intelligence-driven software to accomplish these requirements. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Criteria for participants. new text end new text begin The Office of Justice Programs, in consultation with the School Safety Center, must select one school district in each congressional district to participate in the pilot program under subdivision 1. Selected districts must include both large and small school districts. A school district that has already implemented a system that is similar to a project under this section is ineligible for selection. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Report required. new text end new text begin By January 15, 2027, the commissioner of public safety must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over education and public safety on the pilot project conducted under this section. At a minimum, the report must include: new text end new text begin (1) an evaluation of the pilot project's effectiveness in enhancing school safety; new text end new text begin (2) feedback from participating schools, staff, students, and families; and new text end new text begin (3) recommendations on statewide implementation, funding structures, and system improvements. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATION.new text end new text begin $4,000,000 in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety to implement the school safety threat assessment pilot project under section 1. new text end